District of Columbia statutes.
38-1305

Higher Education Licensure Commission — Transfer of positions; personnel; establishment of panels.

(a)

There shall be transferred to the Commission such positions and their funding that formerly were assigned to the Board of Higher Education for the approval and licensure of post-secondary institutions.

(b)

Personnel shall be appointed and compensation fixed in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 6 of Title 1.

(b-1)

An educational institution licensed by the Commission shall be subject to the laws and regulations that govern degree-granting and non-degree-granting institutions in the District, including those governing the complaint process.

(c)

The Commission may set up panels of persons qualified to inspect, evaluate and make recommendations concerning the approval for licensure of the several kinds of institutions covered by this chapter.

Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-104, § 5, 23 DCR 8734
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(y), 25 DCR 5740
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-217, § 2(e), 36 DCR 523
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-74, § 2(d), 63 DCR 252
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.
1981 Ed., § 31-1605.
1973 Ed., § 31-2005.
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-74 substituted “Higher Education Licensure Commission” for “Education Licensure Commission” in the section heading.
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(d) of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-51, Jan. 9, 2016, 62 DCR 13983).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(d) of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-158, Oct. 16, 2015, 62 DCR 13715).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(d) of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-284, Jan. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 1188).
2-139: See § 1-637.1.